District of Columbia statutes.
6-701.07

Obstruction of fire escapes and approaches.

No door or window leading to any fire escape shall be covered or obstructed by any fixed grating or barrier, and no person shall at any time place any encumbrance or obstacle upon any fire escape or upon any platform, ladder, or stairway leading to or from any fire escape.

History

Mar. 19, 1906, 34 Stat. 71, ch. 957, § 7
June 4, 1934, 48 Stat. 844, ch. 388

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 5-507.
1973 Ed., § 5-307.